Utah statutes.
49-19-501.   Death of member or retiree -- Surviving spouse benefit.
(1)  Upon the death of a governor or legislator who has not yet retired and
who has completed four or more years in the elected office, the member's
spouse at the time of death shall receive an allowance equal to 50% of the
allowance to which the governor or legislator would have been entitled upon
reaching age 65, if the governor or legislator and surviving spouse had been
married at least six months.
(2)  Upon the death of a governor or legislator receiving an allowance under
this plan, the member's spouse at the time of death is entitled to an
allowance equal to 50% of the allowance being paid to the member at the time
of death.
